Washington statutes.
RCW 26.19.055

Payments for attendant services in cases of disability.

Payments from any source, other than veterans' aid and attendance allowances or special medical compensation paid under 38 U.S.C. Sec. 314 (k) through (r), for services provided by an attendant in case of a disability when the disability necessitates the hiring of the services of an attendant shall be disclosed but shall not be included in gross income and shall not be a reason to deviate from the standard calculation.

[ 1991 c 367 s 31.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—Captions not law—1991 c 367: See notes following RCW 26.09.015.